Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5525.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-16-40 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-16 entitled "Teachers’
Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-16-40. Additional benefits payable to retired teachers.
(a) All teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers receiving any service retirement or
ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and
chapter 17 of this title, on or before December 31, 1967, shall receive a cost of living retirement
adjustment equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) per year of the original retirement allowance,
not compounded, for each year the retirement allowance has been in effect. For purposes of
computation credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the
retirement allowance. This cost of living retirement adjustment shall be added to the amount of the
service retirement allowance as of January 1, 1970, and payment shall begin as of July 1, 1970. An
additional cost of living retirement adjustment shall be added to the original retirement allowance
equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance on the first day of January, 1971,
and each year thereafter through December 31, 1980.
(b) All teachers and beneficiaries of teachers receiving any service retirement or ordinary
disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title who retired on or after January
1, 1968, shall, on the first day of January, next following the third (3rd) year on retirement, receive

a cost of living adjustment, in addition to their retirement allowance, an amount equal to three
percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter, on the first
day of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the
original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be continued through December 31, 1980.
(c)(1) Beginning on January 1, 1981, for all teachers and beneficiaries of teachers receiving
any service retirement and all teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers who have completed at least
ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter, and for all teachers and beneficiaries of teachers who receive a disability retirement
allowance pursuant to §§ 16-16-14 — 16-16-17, the cost of living adjustment shall be computed
and paid at the rate of three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance or the retirement
allowance as computed in accordance with § 16-16-40.1, compounded annually from the year for
which the cost of living adjustment was determined to be payable by the retirement board pursuant
to the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. Such cost of living adjustments are available
to teachers who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to apply prospectively only and no
retroactive payment shall be made.
(3) The retirement allowance of all teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers who have not
completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or were not
eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, shall, on the month following the third anniversary date
of the retirement, and on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year be
adjusted and computed by multiplying the retirement allowance by three percent (3%) or the
percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published
by the United States Department of Labor Statistics, determined as of September 30 of the prior
calendar year, whichever is less; the cost of living adjustment shall be compounded annually from
the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined payable by the retirement board;
provided, that no adjustment shall cause any retirement allowance to be decreased from the
retirement allowance provided immediately before such adjustment.
(d) For teachers not eligible to retire in accordance with this chapter as of September 30,
2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost of living
adjustment described in subsection (c)(3) of this section shall only apply to the first thirty-five
thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall commence upon
the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65),
whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published
LC001302 - Page 2 of 12

by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior
calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand dollars
($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be multiplied by the percentage of increase in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States
Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three
percent (3%), whichever is less, on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding
year. For teachers eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article,
and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (d) shall not apply.
(e) The provisions of §§ 45-13-7 — 45-13-10 shall not apply to this section.
(f) This subsection (f) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.
(1) Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to subsection (f)(2)
below, for all present and former teachers, active and retired teachers, and beneficiaries receiving
any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment
provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A)
is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the
“subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined
as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted,
said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B)
is equal to the lesser of the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be
indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under (f)(1)(A) above. The “Five-Year
Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent
five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to subsection (f)(2) below, the
benefit adjustment provided by this subsection (f)(1) shall commence upon the third (3rd)
anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches their Social Security
retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed
rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either
upward or downward in the same amount.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (f)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for
any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’
retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police
retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty
percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all teachers for such plan
year.
LC001302 - Page 3 of 12

In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (f)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (f)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five
plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection (f)(1)
above until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this subsection
(f) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustments not granted on
or prior to June 30, 2012.
(g) This subsection (g) shall become effective July 1, 2015.
(1)(A) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this
subsection (g)(1)(A), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to teachers and/or
beneficiaries of teachers who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%)
of the lesser of either the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) of the teacher’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided
without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.
(B) Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former
teachers, active and retired teachers, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability, or death
allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under
this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (g)(2) below,
shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):
(I) shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (i) plus fifty percent (50%) of (ii) where:
(i) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
(the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns
of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the
retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or
downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.
(ii) is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
LC001302 - Page 4 of 12

Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor
Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
In no event shall the sum of (i) plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less
than (0%) percent.
(II) is equal to the lesser of either the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-
five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount
to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (g)(1)(B)(I) above.
The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (g)(1)(B) shall be provided to all
retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect,
and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the
date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later.
(2) Except for teachers and/or beneficiaries of teachers who retired on or before June 30,
2012, have been retired for more than three (3) full calendar years, the benefit adjustments under
subsection (g)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be reduced to twenty-five percent (25%) of the benefit
adjustment unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment
will be reinstated for all teachers for such plan year. Effective July 1, 2024, the funded ratio of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state
police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, of
exceeding eighty percent (80%) for the benefit adjustment to be reinstated for all teachers for such
plan year shall be replaced with seventy-five percent (75%).
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (g)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Effective for teachers and/or beneficiaries of teachers who retired after June 30, 2012,
or on or before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (g)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand
eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and
twenty-six dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode
Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated
by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%). Effective July 1,
2024, the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement
benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on
LC001302 - Page 5 of 12

an aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) shall be replaced with seventy-five percent
(75%).
(4) Effective for teachers and/or beneficiaries of teachers who have retired on or before
July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60)
days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time
stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends
shall be payable to all retired teachers or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable
payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of
this section.
SECTION 2. Section 36-10-35 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10 entitled "Retirement
System — Contributions and Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-10-35. Additional benefits payable to retired employees.
(a) All state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees receiving any service
retirement or ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of
this title on or before December 31, 1967, shall receive a cost of living retirement adjustment equal
to one and one-half percent (1.5%) per year of the original retirement allowance, not compounded,
for each calendar year the retirement allowance has been in effect. For the purposes of computation,
credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement
allowance. This cost of living adjustment shall be added to the amount of the retirement allowance
as of January 1, 1968, and an additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be added to the
original retirement allowance in each succeeding year during the month of January, and provided
further, that this additional cost of living increase shall be three percent (3%) for the year beginning
January 1, 1971, and each year thereafter, through December 31, 1980. Notwithstanding any of the
above provisions, no employee receiving any service retirement allowance pursuant to the
provisions of this title on or before December 31, 1967, or the employee’s beneficiary, shall receive
any additional benefit hereunder in an amount less than two hundred dollars ($200) per year over
the service retirement allowance where the employee retired prior to January 1, 1958.
(b) All state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees retired on or after January
1, 1968, who are receiving any service retirement or ordinary or accidental disability retirement
allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title shall, on the first day of January next following
the third anniversary date of the retirement, receive a cost of living retirement adjustment, in
addition to their retirement allowance, in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original
retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter through December 31, 1980, during the
month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of
LC001302 - Page 6 of 12

the original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be continued during the lifetime of the
employee or beneficiary. For the purposes of computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar
year regardless of the effective date of the service retirement allowance.
(c)(1) Beginning on January 1, 1981, for all state employees and beneficiaries of the state
employees receiving any service retirement and all state employees, and all beneficiaries of state
employees, who have completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1,
2005, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and for all state employees, and all beneficiaries
of state employees who receive a disability retirement allowance pursuant to §§ 36-10-12 — 36-
10-15, the cost of living adjustment shall be computed and paid at the rate of three percent (3%) of
the original retirement allowance or the retirement allowance as computed in accordance with §
36-10-35.1, compounded annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was
determined to be payable by the retirement board pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) or (b)
of this section. Such cost of living adjustments are available to members who retire before October
1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to apply prospectively only and no
retroactive payment shall be made.
(3) The retirement allowance of all state employees and all beneficiaries of state employees
who have not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or
were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, shall, on the month following the third
anniversary date of retirement, and on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding
year be adjusted and computed by multiplying the retirement allowance by three percent (3%) or
the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as
published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of
the prior calendar year, whichever is less; the cost of living adjustment shall be compounded
annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined payable by the
retirement board; provided, that no adjustment shall cause any retirement allowance to be decreased
from the retirement allowance provided immediately before such adjustment.
(d) For state employees not eligible to retire in accordance with this chapter as of
September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the
cost of living adjustment described in subsection (c)(3) of this section shall only apply to the first
thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall
commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches
age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase
annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-
LC001302 - Page 7 of 12

U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September
30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand
dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, as indexed, shall be multiplied by the percentage of
increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United
States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or
three percent (3%), whichever is less, on the month following the anniversary date of each
succeeding year. For state employees eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon
passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (d) shall not
apply.
(e) All legislators and all beneficiaries of legislators who are receiving a retirement
allowance pursuant to the provisions of § 36-10-9.1 for a period of three (3) or more years, shall,
commencing January 1, 1982, receive a cost of living retirement adjustment, in addition to a
retirement allowance, in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance.
In each succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be
increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, compounded
annually, to be continued during the lifetime of the legislator or beneficiary. For the purposes of
computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the
service retirement allowance.
(f) The provisions of §§ 45-13-7 — 45-13-10 shall not apply to this section.
(g) This subsection (g) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.
(1) Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to subsection (g)(2)
below, for all present and former employees, active and retired members, and beneficiaries
receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit
adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B)
where (A) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
(the “subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser of the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)
amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under (g)(1)(A) above. The
“Five-Year Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the
most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to subsection (g)(2)
below, the benefit adjustment provided by this subsection (g)(1) shall commence upon the third
LC001302 - Page 8 of 12

(3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches their Social
Security retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially
assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted
either upward or downward in the same amount.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for
any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’
retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police
retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty
percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all members for such
plan year.
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (g)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (g)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five
plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection (g)(1)
above until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this subsection
(g) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or
prior to June 30, 2012.
(h) This subsection (h) shall become effective July 1, 2015.
(1)(A) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this
subsection (h)(1)(A), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to members and/or
beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent
(2%) of the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) of the member’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be
provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.
(B) Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former
employees, active and retired members, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or
death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year
under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (h)(2)
below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):
LC001302 - Page 9 of 12

(I) shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (i) plus fifty percent (50%) of (ii) where:
(i) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
(the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns
of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the
retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or
downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.
(ii) is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor
Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year. In no event shall the sum of (i)
plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).
(II) is equal to the lesser of either the member’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-
five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount
to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (h)(1)(B)(I) above.
The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (h)(1)(B) shall be provided to all
retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect,
and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the
date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches their Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later.
(2) Except for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30,
2012, have been retired for more than three (3) full calendar years, the benefit adjustments under
subsection (h)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be reduced to twenty-five percent (25%) of the benefit
adjustment unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment
will be reinstated for all members for such plan year. Effective July 1, 2024, the funded ratio of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state
police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, of
exceeding eighty percent (80%) for the benefit adjustment to be reinstated for all members for such
plan year shall be replaced with seventy-five percent (75%).
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (h)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
LC001302 - Page 10 of 12

current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired after June 30, 2012,
or on or before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (h)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand
eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and
twenty-six dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode
Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated
by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%). Effective July 1,
2024, the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement
benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on
an aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) shall be replaced with seventy-five percent
(75%).
(i) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before
July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60)
days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time
stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends
shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable
payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of
this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001302
========
LC001302 - Page 11 of 12